North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-01 State Department of Health
23-01-40.
Diabetes goals and plans — Report to legislative management.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services, state department of health, Indian affairs commission, and public employees retirement system shall collaborate to identify goals and benchmarks while also developing individual agency plans to reduce the incidence of diabetes in the state, improve diabetes care, and control complications associated with diabetes.

Before June first of each even-numbered year the department of human services, state department of health, Indian affairs commission, and public employees retirement system shall submit a report to the legislative management on the following:

The financial impact and reach diabetes is having on the agency, the state, and localities. Items included in this assessment must include the number of lives with diabetes impacted or covered by the agency, the number of lives with diabetes and family members impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by the agency, the financial toll or impact diabetes and diabetes complications places on the agency’s programs, and the financial toll or impact diabetes and diabetes complications places on the agency’s programs in comparison to other chronic diseases and conditions.

An assessment of the benefits of implemented programs and activities aimed at controlling diabetes and preventing the disease. This assessment must document the amount and source for any funding directed to the agency from the legislative assembly for programs and activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes.

A description of the level of coordination existing between the agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on managing, treating, or preventing diabetes and diabetes complications.

The development or revision of detailed action plans for battling diabetes with a range of actionable items for consideration by the legislative assembly. The plans must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes, prediabetes, and related diabetes complications. The plan must identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling and preventing relevant forms of diabetes.

The development of a detailed budget blueprint identifying needs, costs, and resources required to implement the plan identified in subdivision d. This blueprint must include a budget range for all options presented in the plan identified in subdivision d for consideration by the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 205, § 1.

23-01-40.
Diabetes goals and plans — Report to legislative management.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services, Indian affairs commission, and public employees retirement system shall collaborate to identify goals and benchmarks while also developing individual agency plans to reduce the incidence of diabetes in the state, improve diabetes care, and control complications associated with diabetes.

Before June first of each even-numbered year the department of health and human services, Indian affairs commission, and public employees retirement system shall submit a report to the legislative management on the following:

The financial impact and reach diabetes is having on the agency, the state, and localities. Items included in this assessment must include the number of lives with diabetes impacted or covered by the agency, the number of lives with diabetes and family members impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by the agency, the financial toll or impact diabetes and diabetes complications places on the agency’s programs, and the financial toll or impact diabetes and diabetes complications places on the agency’s programs in comparison to other chronic diseases and conditions.

An assessment of the benefits of implemented programs and activities aimed at controlling diabetes and preventing the disease. This assessment must document the amount and source for any funding directed to the agency from the legislative assembly for programs and activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes.

A description of the level of coordination existing between the agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on managing, treating, or preventing diabetes and diabetes complications.

The development or revision of detailed action plans for battling diabetes with a range of actionable items for consideration by the legislative assembly. The plans must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes, prediabetes, and related diabetes complications. The plan must identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling and preventing relevant forms of diabetes.

The development of a detailed budget blueprint identifying needs, costs, and resources required to implement the plan identified in subdivision d. This blueprint must include a budget range for all options presented in the plan identified in subdivision d for consideration by the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 205, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 132, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-41.
Autism spectrum disorder database — Rulemaking — Confidentiality.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall establish and administer an autism spectrum disorder database. The database must include a record of all reported cases of autism spectrum disorder in the state and any other information determined relevant and appropriate by the department in order to complete epidemiologic surveys of the autism spectrum disorder, enable research and analysis of the autism spectrum disorder, and provide services to individuals with an autism spectrum disorder.

The state department of health shall establish criteria regarding who is qualified to report a case of autism spectrum disorder to the database. In establishing this criteria, the department shall require that the reporter be a physician or psychologist or any other licensed or certified health care professional who is qualified by training and by licensure or certification to make the diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder.

The database established under this section must:

Include the reported individual’s diagnoses under the most recent edition of the American psychiatric association’s diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders; and

Indicate whether a complete physical evaluation was performed by a licensed independent practitioner as part of the diagnostic process for autism spectrum disorder.

The health council shall adopt rules to provide for mandatory reporting to the autism spectrum disorder database and to establish reporting requirements, including timeliness requirements. A reporter who makes the diagnosis an individual is affected with autism spectrum disorder, or the reporter’s designee, shall report this diagnosis in the form or manner prescribed by the state department of health.

The state department of health shall keep confidential all records of the database which could be used to identify a reported individual; however, the department may provide these records to other state agencies as necessary to effect the purposes of this database without regard to the confidential nature of the records. If the department provides confidential records of the database to a state agency, the department shall notify the receiving agency of the confidential nature of the records and the receiving agency shall treat these records as confidential.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 206, § 1; 2015, ch. 185, § 1, effective April 9, 2015.

23-01-41.
Autism spectrum disorder database — Rulemaking — Confidentiality.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall establish and administer an autism spectrum disorder database. The database must include a record of all reported cases of autism spectrum disorder in the state and any other information determined relevant and appropriate by the department in order to complete epidemiologic surveys of the autism spectrum disorder, enable research and analysis of the autism spectrum disorder, and provide services to individuals with an autism spectrum disorder.

The department of health and human services shall establish criteria regarding who is qualified to report a case of autism spectrum disorder to the database. In establishing this criteria, the department shall require that the reporter be a physician or psychologist or any other licensed or certified health care professional who is qualified by training and by licensure or certification to make the diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder.

The database established under this section must:

Include the reported individual’s diagnoses under the most recent edition of the American psychiatric association’s diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders; and

Indicate whether a complete physical evaluation was performed by a licensed independent practitioner as part of the diagnostic process for autism spectrum disorder.

The department of health and human services shall adopt rules to provide for mandatory reporting to the autism spectrum disorder database and to establish reporting requirements, including timeliness requirements. A reporter who makes the diagnosis an individual is affected with autism spectrum disorder, or the reporter’s designee, shall report this diagnosis in the form or manner prescribed by the department of health and human services.

The department of health and human services shall keep confidential all records of the database which could be used to identify a reported individual; however, the department may provide these records to other state agencies as necessary to effect the purposes of this database without regard to the confidential nature of the records. If the department provides confidential records of the database to a state agency, the department shall notify the receiving agency of the confidential nature of the records and the receiving agency shall treat these records as confidential.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 206, § 1; 2015, ch. 185, § 1, effective April 9, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 133, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-42.
Opioid antagonist prescription, distribution, possession, or use — Immunity from liability. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Health care professional” means a licensed or certified health care professional who is working within the scope of practice for that profession. The term may include a physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, and pharmacist acting in the professional’s scope of practice.

“Opioid antagonist” means a drug:

That is approved by the United States food and drug administration for the treatment of a drug overdose and is recognized by the state department of health for the treatment of a drug overdose; and

That when administered negates or neutralizes, in whole or in part, the pharmacological effects of an opioid in the body.

A health care professional acting in good faith may directly or by standing order prescribe, distribute, or dispense an opioid antagonist, if the health care professional provides training to:

An individual at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose; or

A family member, friend, or other individual in a position to assist an individual at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose.

An individual acting in good faith may receive or possess an opioid antagonist if that individual is:

An individual at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose; or

A family member, friend, or other individual in a position to assist an individual at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose.

An individual acting in good faith may self-administer an opioid antagonist or administer an opioid antagonist to another individual who the administering individual suspects is at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose.

An individual may receive, possess, or administer an opioid antagonist under subsection 3 or 4, regardless of whether the individual is the individual for or to whom the opioid antagonist is prescribed, distributed, or dispensed.

An individual who prescribes, distributes, dispenses, receives, possesses, or administers an opioid antagonist as authorized under this section is immune from civil and criminal liability for such action. A health care professional who prescribes, distributes, or dispenses an opioid antagonist as authorized under this section is not subject to professional discipline for such action. This section does not expand the scope of practice of a health care professional. Immunity from liability or discipline under this subsection does not apply if the individual’s actions constitute recklessness, gross negligence, or intentional misconduct.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 187, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

23-01-42.
Opioid antagonist prescription, distribution, possession, or use — Immunity from liability.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Health care professional” means a licensed or certified health care professional who is working within the scope of practice for that profession. The term may include a physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, and pharmacist acting in the professional’s scope of practice.

“Opioid antagonist” means a drug:

That is approved by the United States food and drug administration for the treatment of a drug overdose and is recognized by the department of health and human services for the treatment of a drug overdose; and

That when administered negates or neutralizes, in whole or in part, the pharmacological effects of an opioid in the body.

A health care professional acting in good faith may directly or by standing order prescribe, distribute, or dispense an opioid antagonist, if the health care professional provides training to:

An individual at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose; or

A family member, friend, or other individual in a position to assist an individual at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose.

An individual acting in good faith may receive or possess an opioid antagonist if that individual is:

An individual at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose; or

A family member, friend, or other individual in a position to assist an individual at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose.

An individual acting in good faith may self-administer an opioid antagonist or administer an opioid antagonist to another individual who the administering individual suspects is at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose.

An individual may receive, possess, or administer an opioid antagonist under subsection 3 or 4, regardless of whether the individual is the individual for or to whom the opioid antagonist is prescribed, distributed, or dispensed.

An individual who prescribes, distributes, dispenses, receives, possesses, or administers an opioid antagonist as authorized under this section is immune from civil and criminal liability for such action. A health care professional who prescribes, distributes, or dispenses an opioid antagonist as authorized under this section is not subject to professional discipline for such action. This section does not expand the scope of practice of a health care professional. Immunity from liability or discipline under this subsection does not apply if the individual’s actions constitute recklessness, gross negligence, or intentional misconduct.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 187, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 134, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-43.
Mammogram results. [Expired]

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 186, § 1, effective April 8, 2015; expired by 2015, ch. 186, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

23-01-44.
Syringe or needle exchange program — Authorization.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Program” means a syringe exchange program established and operated under this section.

“Qualified entity” means:

A local health department;

A city that operates a program within the boundaries of the city; or

An organization that has been authorized to operate a program by the state department of health, the board of county commissioners, or the governing body for the operation of a program within the boundaries of the city.

“Supplies” include needles, syringes, sterile disposal preparation spoons, cotton, sterile filters, alcohol wipes, sterile water, saline, tourniquets, disposal containers, wound care, testing strips, naloxone, and other items recognized as supporting safe drug use.

The state department of health, in collaboration with the department of human services behavioral health division, shall design a syringe exchange program. The state department of health shall administer the program.

The state department of health may authorize a qualified entity to operate a program in a county if:

The area to be served is at risk of an increase or potential increase in prevalence of viral hepatitis or human immunodeficiency virus;

A syringe exchange program is medically appropriate as part of a comprehensive public health response; and

The qualified entity conducted a public hearing and submitted a report of the findings and an administration plan for the program to the state health officer.

A qualified entity operating a program under this chapter shall:

Register the program annually in the manner prescribed by the state department of health;

Have a pharmacist, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse who is licensed in the state to provide oversight for the program;

Store and dispose of all syringes, needles, and supplies collected in a safe and legal manner;

Provide education and training on drug overdose response and treatment, including the administration of an overdose reversal medication;

Provide education, referral, and linkage to human immunodeficiency virus, viral hepatitis, and sexually transmitted disease prevention, treatment, and care services;

Provide addiction treatment information and referrals to drug treatment programs, including programs in the local area and programs that offer medication-assisted treatment that includes a federal food and drug administration approved long-acting, non-addictive medication for the treatment of opioid or alcohol use disorder;

Provide syringe, needle, supply, and injection supply distribution and collection without collecting or recording personally identifiable information;

Operate in a manner consistent with public health and safety; and

Ensure the program is medically appropriate and part of a comprehensive public health response.

The state department of health may terminate a program for failure to comply with any of the provisions in this section.

A state agency may not provide general fund moneys to a program to purchase or otherwise acquire hypodermic syringes, needles, or injection supplies for a program under this section.

A law enforcement officer may not stop, search, or seize an individual based on the individual’s participation in a program under this section. Syringes, needles, and supplies appropriately collected under this section are not considered drug paraphernalia as provided in chapter 19-03.4 or possession of a controlled substance under section 19-03.1-23.

Each program shall file a semiannual report with the state department of health containing the following information listed on a daily basis and by location, identified by the postal zip code, where the program distributed and collected syringes, needles, and supplies:

The number of individuals served;

The number of syringes, needles, and supplies collected;

The number of syringes and needles distributed; and

Any additional information requested by the state department of health.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 166, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 225, § 5, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 392, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 195, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 23-01-44 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 195, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1163; and Section 135 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

23-01-44.
Syringe or needle exchange program — Authorization.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Program” means a syringe exchange program established and operated under this section.

“Qualified entity” means:

A local health department;

A city that operates a program within the boundaries of the city; or

An organization that has been authorized to operate a program by the department of health and human services, the board of county commissioners, or the governing body for the operation of a program within the boundaries of the city.

“Supplies” include needles, syringes, sterile disposal preparation spoons, cotton, sterile filters, alcohol wipes, sterile water, saline, tourniquets, disposal containers, wound care, testing strips, naloxone, and other items recognized as supporting safe drug use.

The department of health and human services shall design and administer a syringe exchange program.

The department of health and human services may authorize a qualified entity to operate a program in a county if:

The area to be served is at risk of an increase or potential increase in prevalence of viral hepatitis or human immunodeficiency virus;

A syringe exchange program is medically appropriate as part of a comprehensive public health response; and

The qualified entity conducted a public hearing and submitted a report of the findings and an administration plan for the program to the state health officer.

A qualified entity operating a program under this chapter shall:

Register the program annually in the manner prescribed by the department of health and human services;

Have a pharmacist, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse who is licensed in the state to provide oversight for the program;

Store and dispose of all syringes, needles, and supplies collected in a safe and legal manner;

Provide education and training on drug overdose response and treatment, including the administration of an overdose reversal medication;

Provide education, referral, and linkage to human immunodeficiency virus, viral hepatitis, and sexually transmitted disease prevention, treatment, and care services;

Provide addiction treatment information and referrals to drug treatment programs, including programs in the local area and programs that offer medication-assisted treatment that includes a federal food and drug administration approved long-acting, non-addictive medication for the treatment of opioid or alcohol use disorder;

Provide syringe, needle, supply, and injection supply distribution and collection without collecting or recording personally identifiable information;

Operate in a manner consistent with public health and safety; and

Ensure the program is medically appropriate and part of a comprehensive public health response.

The department of health and human services may terminate a program for failure to comply with any of the provisions in this section.

A state agency may not provide general fund moneys to a program to purchase or otherwise acquire hypodermic syringes, needles, or injection supplies for a program under this section.

A law enforcement officer may not stop, search, or seize an individual based on the individual’s participation in a program under this section. Syringes, needles, and supplies appropriately collected under this section are not considered drug paraphernalia as provided in chapter 19-03.4 or possession of a controlled substance under section 19-03.1-23.

Each program shall file a semiannual report with the department of health and human services containing the following information listed on a daily basis and by location, identified by the postal zip code, where the program distributed and collected syringes, needles, and supplies:

The number of individuals served;

The number of syringes, needles, and supplies collected;

The number of syringes and needles distributed; and

Any additional information requested by the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 166, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 225, § 5, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 392, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 195, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 135, effective September 1, 2022.